Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB396.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 301(w) of the act of March 4, 1971 (P.L.6, No.2), known as the Tax Reform Code of 1971, is amended to read:Section 301. Definitions.--Any reference in this article to the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 shall mean the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 (Public Law 99-514, 26 U.S.C. § 1 et seq.), as amended to January 1, 1997, unless the reference contains the phrase "as amended" and refers to no other date, in which case 1234567891011121314151617181920212223 the reference shall be to the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 as it exists as of the time of application of this article. The following words, terms and phrases when used in this article shall have the meaning ascribed to them in this section except where the context clearly indicates a different meaning:* * *(w) "Taxpayer" means any individual, estate or trust subject to the tax imposed by this article, any partnership having a partner who is a taxpayer under this act, any Pennsylvania S corporation having a shareholder who is a taxpayer under this act [and], any person required to withhold tax under this article and, unless otherwise provided, a pass-through entity that elects to pay the tax imposed under section 302.3.Section 2. The act is amended by adding a section to read:Section 302.3. Elective Tax Imposed at Pass-Through Entity Level.--(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of this article, a pass-through entity may elect, on an annual basis, to have the tax imposed under this article applied to the income of the pass-through entity. The following shall apply:(1) An electing partnership shall be subject to and shall pay a tax imposed at the rate provided in section 302(b) on:(i) Each resident taxable owner's share of each class of income and gain enumerated in section 303 for the taxable year.(ii) Each nonresident taxable owner's share of each class of income and gain enumerated in section 303 from sources within this Commonwealth for the taxable year.(2) An electing Pennsylvania S corporation with all resident shareholders shall be subject to and shall pay a tax imposed at the rate provided in section 302(b) on each resident taxable owner's share of each class of income and gain enumerated in 20250SB0396PN0508 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 section 303 from sources within this Commonwealth for the taxable year.(3) An electing Pennsylvania S corporation whose shareholders are comprised of either nonresident shareholders, or resident and nonresident shareholders shall be subject to and shall pay a tax imposed at the rate provided in section 302(b) on each taxable owner's share of each class of income and gain enumerated in section 303 from sources within this Commonwealth for the taxable year.(4) An entity that is disregarded for tax purposes under this article shall be disregarded for the purposes of this section.(5) In determining its tax under this section, a pass-through entity that owns a direct or indirect ownership interest in one or more pass-through entities shall include its share of each class of income enumerated in section 303 received from those pass-through entities. The pass-through entity that generates an item of income, gain or loss shall determine its classification and whether that item of income, gain or loss constitutes income or loss from sources within this Commonwealth.(6) Guaranteed payments made to a partner in a partnership shall be treated as additional income allocated to the partner. With respect to a nonresident taxable owner, only guaranteed payments that constitute income from sources within this Commonwealth shall be subject to the tax under this section.(7) In determining the tax due under this section, a pass-through entity shall not be permitted to use any tax credits otherwise available to the pass-through entity except a credit for estimated taxes paid for the current taxable year under this 20250SB0396PN0508 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 section or an overpayment of a prior-year tax paid under this section.(b) (1) Any election described under subsection (a) shall be made by an individual with authority to bind the pass-through entity or sign returns under this article or who is authorized to make the election and represents to having the authorization under penalty of perjury on or before the original due date of the pass-through entity's return under this article for the taxable year in a manner prescribed by the department.(2) Only one election may be submitted by an individual identified under clause (1) on behalf of the pass-through entity to the department for the taxable year.(3) An election made under this section shall be irrevocable for the taxable year.(4) An election under this section may be made only for tax years that the limitation on individual deductions applies under 26 U.S.C. § 164(b)(6) (relating to taxes).(c) (1) A taxable owner of an interest in a pass-through entity that elects to pay tax under subsection (a) shall be allowed a refundable credit against the tax imposed under section 302 in the amount of the taxable owner's share of the tax that the pass-through entity actually paid under this section. A taxable owner's share of the tax shall take into account guaranteed payments and other special allocations made to the owner.(2) A taxable owner shall be entitled to claim the credit under clause (1) on the taxable owner's tax return that includes the corresponding income and gain of the pass-through entity.(3) The credit allowed under this subsection shall be applied after the application of all other tax credits available 20250SB0396PN0508 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 to the owner for the taxable year. If the amount of the credit allowable under this subsection for any taxable year exceeds the tax due for the year under this article, the excess amount shall be treated as an overpayment, to be credited or refunded.(4) No credit shall be allowed to a taxable owner under clause (1) unless the electing pass-through entity paid the tax imposed under this article and provides the department on its tax return all the information required in subsection (d)(3) and (4).(5) The aggregate amount of credits claimed by all taxable owners of a pass-through entity under clause (1) may not exceed the tax that the pass-through entity paid under subsection (a) for the taxable year.(d) (1) On or before the date provided under section 330.1(b) or 335(c), each pass-through entity that elects to pay tax under subsection (a) shall file a return for the taxable year reporting the information required under this subsection and pay the tax due.(2) If a pass-through entity is granted an extension to file a return required to be filed under section 330.1(b) or 335(c), the extension shall apply for purposes of filing the return under this section, but not for the payment of any tax due under subsection (a).(3) The return filed under clause (1) shall include, in a format as prescribed by the department, a certification by an individual authorized to act on behalf of the pass-through entity, which includes that all statements contained in the return are true and correct.(4) Each pass-through entity that elects to pay tax under subsection (a) shall report on a return required under this 20250SB0396PN0508 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 article the following:(i) Any tax due under this article. The balance of any tax shown on the return, not previously paid as installments of estimated tax or an overpayment of a prior-year tax, shall be paid with the return.(ii) Identifying information of each taxable owner eligible to receive a credit under subsection (c), including a Social Security number or tax identification number and status as a resident or nonresident. The pass-through entity must provide information sufficient to identify a disregarded entity and its taxable owners.(iii) For each taxable owner who will be entitled to claim a credit on a tax return, the taxable owner's share of the tax imposed on the pass-through entity under this section.(iv) Each resident taxable owner's share of the pass-through entity's income and each nonresident taxable owner's share of income from sources from within this Commonwealth included in the tax base under this section.(v) The classification of each owner as a taxable resident or nonresident for purposes of calculating the pass-through entity's tax liability under this section.(vi) Any other information as required by the department.(5) A pass-through entity that elects to pay tax under subsection (a) shall not be required to withhold tax from a nonresident taxable owner under section 324.(6) To meet the requirements of this section, if a taxable owner holds an interest in the pass-through entity through an entity that is a disregarded entity for purposes of this article, the pass-through entity must provide information sufficient to identify both the disregarded entity that holds an 20250SB0396PN0508 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 interest in the pass-through entity and the taxable owner that owns the disregarded entity and is eligible for a credit under subsection (c).(7) Each pass-through entity paying tax under this section shall report to each taxable owner required to file a return under this article a statement that contains the following information:(i) Classification as a resident taxable owner or a nonresident taxable owner for purposes of calculating the pass-through entity's tax under subsection (a).(ii) The taxable owner's allocable share of the pass-through entity's income included in the tax base for purposes of computing the tax under subsection (a).(iii) The owner's allocable share of the tax paid under subsection (a).(iv) Any other information, as required by the department.(e) (1) Any assessment of tax imposed under this section, including interest, penalties and additions, shall be assessed against the pass-through entity at the tax rate applicable to the tax year. The department may not assess any additional tax, including interest, penalties and additions, against the taxable owners.(2) Any determination of an overpayment or refund of tax imposed under this section made subsequent to the filing of the return under subsection (d) shall be made at the pass-through entity level at the tax rate applicable to the tax year.(3) The pass-through entity shall be required to provide each owner a statement of any adjustment of the taxable owner's credit within ninety days of an assessment, overpayment or refund becoming final.20250SB0396PN0508 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (4) The taxable owner shall report the adjustment of the credit on an amended return for the taxable owner's taxable year that includes the pass-through entity's taxable year for which the tax was assessed.(5) Only the pass-through entity may appeal or settle an assessment or overpayment of tax issued under this section or petition for a refund of tax imposed under this section.(f) The basis of both a resident taxable owner and nonresident taxable owner of a pass-through entity that elects to pay tax under subsection (a) shall be determined as if the election under subsection (b) had not been made and each of the taxable owners of the taxed pass-through entity had properly taken into account each taxable owner's pro rata share of the taxed pass-through entity's items of income, gain, loss and deduction in the manner required with respect to a pass-through entity for which no such election is in effect.(G) (1) AN IRREVOCABLE ELECTION TO BE AN ELECTING PASS-THROUGH ENTITY FOR A TAXABLE YEAR SHALL BE MADE WITH THE FILING OF A RETURN AND THE PAYING OF ANY TAX DUE FOR THE TAXABLE YEAR ON OR BEFORE THE LATER OF NINETY (90) DAYS AFTER THE EFFECTIVE DATE OF THIS SUBSECTION, OR THE DUE DATE, INCLUDING EXTENSIONS, OF THE PASS-THROUGH ENTITY ' S TAX RETURN UNDER SECTION 330.1 OR 335(C). THE PERIOD FOR FILING A RETURN SHALL NOT BE EXTENDED. AN ELECTION SHALL BE INVALID IF THE RETURN IS NOT FILED AND FULL PAYMENT OF ANY TAX DUE IS NOT MADE ON OR BEFORE THE DUE DATE. A PASS-THROUGH ENTITY ONLY MAY MAKE AN ELECTION UNDER THIS SUBSECTION FOR A TAXABLE YEAR IN WHICH THE PASS-THROUGH ENTITY FILED A TAX RETURN OR IS UNDER A VALID EXTENSION TO FILE A RETURN FOR THE TAXABLE YEAR.(2) THE TAX RETURN SHALL REFLECT ASSESSMENTS THAT CHANGE THE 20250SB0396PN0508 - 8 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 TAXABLE INCOME OF THE ELECTING PASS-THROUGH ENTITY, OR AMENDED TAX RETURNS THAT THE ELECTING PASS-THROUGH ENTITY HAS FILED ON OR BEFORE THE DUE DATE OF THE TAX RETURN UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) THAT WOULD CHANGE A TAXABLE OWNER ' S PASS-THROUGH ENTITY CREDIT FOR THE TAXABLE YEAR. THE CREDIT SHALL NOT BE ADJUSTED AT THE PASS-THROUGH ENTITY LEVEL TO REFLECT ANY SUBSEQUENT CHANGES OF THE ELECTING PASS-THROUGH ENTITY ' S TAXABLE INCOME. (3) IN DETERMINING THE AMOUNT OF TAX DUE IN A TAXABLE YEAR, AN ELECTING PASS-THROUGH ENTITY SHALL BE ENTITLED TO A CREDIT FOR TAX WITHHELD AND REMITTED ON BEHALF OF A NONRESIDENT TAXABLE OWNER AND REPORTED ON A SCHEDULE NRK-1 PROVIDED TO THE TAXABLE OWNER FOR THE TAXABLE YEAR REDUCED BY ANY WITHHELD TAX REFUNDED TO THE ELECTING PASS-THROUGH ENTITY OR CREDITED TO A SUBSEQUENT TAX YEAR.(4) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL HAVE THE AUTHORITY TO ADJUST THE TAX IN CONNECTION WITH A RETURN FILED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) WITHIN TWELVE (12) MONTHS FROM THE FILING OF THE TAX RETURN.(5) AN ELECTING PASS-THROUGH ENTITY SHALL PROVIDE THE TAXABLE OWNER A STATEMENT DESCRIBED IN SUBSECTION (D)(7) ON OR BEFORE THE LATER OF NINETY (90) DAYS FROM THE EFFECTIVE DATE OF THIS SUBSECTION, OR THE DUE DATE, INCLUDING EXTENSIONS, OF THE PASS-THROUGH ENTITY ' S TAX RETURN UNDER SECTION 330.1 OR 335(C). THE PENALTY IN SECTION 353(F) SHALL APPLY TO EACH STATEMENT NOT PROVIDED TO A TAXABLE OWNER WITHIN THE NINETY-DAY PERIOD.(6) A TAXABLE OWNER SHALL CLAIM THE CREDIT IN SUBSECTION (C) ON AN AMENDED TAX RETURN FOR THE TAXABLE YEAR OR IN THE CURRENT TAX YEAR. AN AMENDED TAX RETURN MUST BE FILED IF THERE IS A PENDING PETITION FOR REFUND OR PENDING APPEAL OF AN ASSESSMENT OR PETITION FOR REFUND AS OF THE DUE DATE OF THE AMENDED TAX RETURN.20250SB0396PN0508 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (7) IN DETERMINING THE AMOUNT OF THE CREDIT IN THIS SECTION, A NONRESIDENT TAXABLE OWNER SHALL NOT BE PERMITTED TO CLAIM A CREDIT FOR TAX THAT THE ELECTING PASS-THROUGH ENTITY WITHHELD AND REMITTED ON BEHALF OF THE NONRESIDENT TAXABLE OWNER AND TREATED AS A PAYMENT OF THE TAX UNDER THIS SECTION. A NONRESIDENT TAXABLE OWNER SHALL NOT BE ENTITLED TO A REFUND OF, OR CREDIT FOR, ANY PORTION OF THE CREDIT UNDER SUBSECTION (C) FOR WHICH A REFUND OF PREVIOUSLY WITHHELD AND REMITTED TAX WAS RECEIVED, OR AN OVERPAYMENT WAS APPLIED TO ANOTHER TAXABLE YEAR. (8) IN DETERMINING WHETHER A RESIDENT TAXABLE OWNER IS ENTITLED TO A REFUND OF THE CREDIT UNDER SUBSECTION (C), TAX PAYMENTS OR CREDITS SHALL EXCLUDE TAX PAYMENTS MADE FOR THE TAXABLE YEAR OR AVAILABLE CREDITS THAT WERE REFUNDED OR APPLIED TO ANOTHER TAX YEAR OR TAX.(9) A TAXABLE OWNER MAY NOT RECEIVE A DOUBLE TAX BENEFIT THROUGH THE RETROACTIVE APPLICATION OF THIS SECTION IF THERE HAS BEEN A PREVIOUS REFUND OR CREDIT TO ANOTHER TAXABLE YEAR OR TAX OF A TAX OVERPAYMENT OR TAX CREDIT.(10) A TAXABLE OWNER SHALL FILE AN AMENDED TAX RETURN ON OR BEFORE ONE HUNDRED EIGHTY (180) DAYS AFTER THE EFFECTIVE DATE OF THIS SUBSECTION. THE PERIOD FOR FILING AN AMENDED TAX RETURN SHALL NOT BE EXTENDED. AN AMENDED TAX RETURN REQUESTING A REFUND OR CREDIT FILED AFTER THE DUE DATE SHALL NOT BE ACCEPTED AND PROCESSED.(11) THE AMENDED TAX RETURN SHALL REFLECT ASSESSMENTS THAT CHANGE THE TAXABLE INCOME OF THE TAXABLE OWNER AND REFUND CLAIMS PENDING ON OR BEFORE THE DUE DATE OF THE TAX RETURN. IF AN AMENDED TAX RETURN HAS BEEN FILED AFTER A PETITION FOR REFUND HAS BEEN FILED, OR AN ADMINISTRATIVE OR JUDICIAL APPEAL OF AN ASSESSMENT OR REFUND PETITION HAS BEEN TAKEN, THE AMENDED TAX 20250SB0396PN0508 - 10 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 RETURN SHALL BE DEEMED A PART OF THE ORIGINAL TAX RETURN UPON PETITION OF THE TAXPAYER AT ANY SUBSEQUENT PROCEEDING AS THOUGH IT HAD BEEN FILED WITH THE ORIGINAL TAX RETURN. A SEPARATE APPEAL OF AN ASSESSMENT OR PETITION FOR REFUND SHALL NOT BE REQUIRED TO BE FILED IF THE DETERMINATION OF THE CORRECT AMOUNT OF THE CREDIT IN THIS SECTION DEPENDS UPON THE RESOLUTION OF THE ISSUES IN THE APPEAL OR PETITION FOR REFUND.(12) PARAGRAPH (6) SHALL APPLY TO AN ELECTING PASS-THROUGH ENTITY THAT HAS FILED A CONSOLIDATED RETURN ON BEHALF OF SOME OR ALL ELECTING NONRESIDENT TAXABLE OWNERS FOR A TAXABLE YEAR. AN ELECTING PASS-THROUGH ENTITY ALSO MUST FILE AN AMENDED TAX RETURN IF THE COMPOSITION OF TAXABLE OWNERS ELECTING TO FILE AS PART OF THE CONSOLIDATED GROUP DIFFERS IN THE TAXABLE YEAR FOR WHICH THE CREDIT IS BEING CLAIMED AND THE CURRENT TAXABLE YEAR.(13) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL HAVE THE AUTHORITY TO ASSESS TAX IN CONNECTION WITH AN AMENDED TAX RETURN FILED UNDER PARAGRAPH (6) OR (12) WITHIN THE LATER OF TWELVE (12) MONTHS FOR THE FILING OF THE AMENDED TAX RETURN, OR THE EXPIRATION OF THE APPLICABLE STATUTE IN SECTION 348. IF THE STATUTE OF LIMITATIONS FOR ASSESSING ADDITIONAL TAX IN SECTION 348 FOR A TAX YEAR HAS OTHERWISE LAPSED, THE DEPARTMENT ONLY MAY ADJUST ITEMS RELATED TO THE CREDIT DETERMINED IN SUBSECTION (C) AND PARAGRAPH (5).(14) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL NOT ASSESS ANY INTEREST OR PENALTY ARISING FROM THE TIMELY FILING OF A TAX RETURN AND PAYMENT OF ANY TAX ARISING FROM THE APPLICATION OF THIS SUBSECTION. THE DEPARTMENT SHALL NOT PAY ANY INTEREST ARISING FROM A REFUND OR OVERPAYMENT ARISING FROM THE APPLICATION OF THIS SUBSECTION.(g) (H) (1) Unless otherwise provided in, or inconsistent with, this section, the provisions of this article shall apply to this section.20250SB0396PN0508 - 11 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (2) The department may issue guidance and promulgate regulations necessary for the implementation of this section.(h) (1) (I) In the case of any taxable year that includes the effective date of this clause, any nonresident withholding made under section 324 by the pass-through entity for the current tax year for an owner shall be applied by the pass-through entity against its estimated tax liability.(2) In the case of any taxable year that includes the effective date of this clause, the department may not assess interest and penalties against an eligible pass-through entity for any underpayment of estimated tax due under subsection (d), so long as the eligible pass-through entity acted in good faith with no intent to defraud the Commonwealth.(J) EXCEPT FOR SUBSECTION (G), THE PENALTY IN SECTION 353(F) SHALL APPLY TO EACH STATEMENT NOT PROVIDED TO A TAXABLE OWNER UNDER THIS SECTION.(i) (K) As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Electing pass-through entity." A pass-through entity that elects for a taxable year to be subject to the tax under this section to determine its tax in accordance with subsection (a)."Nonresident taxable owner." An individual, estate or trust subject to the tax imposed under this article, other than a resident taxable owner, that is a partner, shareholder, member or other owner of an interest in a pass-through entity that has income from sources within this Commonwealth."Partnership." A domestic or foreign general partnership, joint venture, limited partnership, limited liability company, business trust or other unincorporated entity that for Federal 20250SB0396PN0508 - 12 - <--<--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 income tax purposes is classified as a partnership. The term does not include a publicly traded partnership."Pass-through entity." A partnership or Pennsylvania S corporation."Resident taxable owner." A resident individual, resident trust or resident estate that is a partner, shareholder, member or other owner of an interest in a pass-through entity."Taxable owner." A resident taxable owner or nonresident taxable owner. FOR TAX YEARS BEGINNING AFTER 2024, THE TERMS " NONRESIDENT TAXABLE OWNER, " " RESIDENT TAXABLE OWNER " AND " TAXABLE OWNER " SHALL INCLUDE THE GRANTOR OF A TRUST OR OTHER PERSON TO THE EXTENT THAT THE GRANTOR OR THE OTHER PERSON IS TAXABLE ON TRUST INCOME UNDER SECTION 302(C).Section 3. Sections 306 and 307.8(a) of the act are amended to read:Section 306. Taxability of Partners.--Except as provided under [section] sections 302.3 and 306.2, a partnership as an entity shall not be subject to the tax imposed by this article, but the income or gain of a member of a partnership in respect of said partnership shall be subject to the tax and the tax shall be imposed on his share, whether or not distributed, of the income or gain received by the partnership for its taxable year ending within or with the member's taxable year.Section 307.8. Income of a Pennsylvania S Corporation.--(a) A Pennsylvania S corporation shall not be subject to the tax imposed by this article, except as provided under subsection (f) and section 302.3, but the shareholders of the Pennsylvania S corporation shall be subject to the tax imposed under this article as provided in this article.* * *20250SB0396PN0508 - 13 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Section 4. The amendment or addition of sections 301(w), 302.3, 306 and 307.8(a) of the act shall apply to taxable years beginning after December 31, 2020. THIS ACT SHALL APPLY AS FOLLOWS:(1) THE AMENDMENT OR ADDITION OF SECTION 301(W), 306 AND 307.8(A) OF THE ACT SHALL APPLY TO TAXABLE YEARS BEGINNING AFTER DECEMBER 31, 2022.(2) (I) EXCEPT FOR SUBPARAGRAPH (II), THE AMENDMENT OF SECTION 302.3 OF THE ACT SHALL APPLY TO TAXABLE YEARS BEGINNING AFTER DECEMBER 31, 2022.(II) THE ADDITION OF SECTION 302.3(G) OF THE ACT SHALL APPLY TO TAXABLE YEARS BEGINNING IN 2023 AND 2024.Section 5. This act shall take effect immediately.20250SB0396PN0508 - 14 - <--<--12345678910111213